Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-108
Election, defined.

Election shall mean any statewide or local primary, special, joint, or general election at which registered voters of the state or the political subdivision holding the election by ballot choose public officials or decide any questions and propositions lawfully submitted to them.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 8.

Court has jurisdiction over contest of election for reorganization of school districts. Arends v. Whitten, 172 Neb. 297, 109 N.W.2d 363 (1961).

School district elections are specifically excepted from general primary election law. Farrell v. School Dist. No. 54, 164 Neb. 853, 84 N.W.2d 126 (1957).